Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Article 8. Cleanup of Illegal Drug Sites.

Sec. 46.03.500.
Notice of illegal drug manufacturing site; Internet list.

When a law enforcement officer or team of law enforcement officers, qualified under federal regulations to investigate and dismantle illegal drug manufacturing sites, determines that a site constitutes an illegal drug manufacturing site, the primary law enforcement agency that conducted the investigation shall notify the owner of the property, the occupants and users of the property, and the department that the determination has been made. The owner of the property may appeal the determination to the superior court for review of whether the determination was made in compliance with this subsection. In the appeal, the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the determination was made in compliance with this subsection is on the primary law enforcement agency that conducted the investigation.

The notice to the property owner required under (a) of this section shall be given in a manner that is consistent with the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure for the service of process in a civil action in this state and must include the following information:

the parcel identification number and legal description of the property where the site is located;

a statement of the determination made by the primary law enforcement agency that the site was an illegal drug manufacturing site and the findings that formed the basis for the determination;

a citation to, and short summary of, AS

46.03.510

, which restricts transfer and occupancy of the site until it is determined to be fit for use; and

the following information, which shall be provided to the primary law enforcement agency by the department:

a copy of the standards contained in regulations adopted under AS

46.03.530

that determine whether the property is fit for use;

a copy of the sampling and testing procedures established under AS

46.03.520(b)

and a copy of the list of laboratories maintained under AS

46.03.520(c)

that must be used for determining whether the property is fit for use; and

a copy of the guidelines for decontamination established by the department under AS

46.03.540(b)

.

The notice to the department required under (a) of this section must include

the parcel identification number and legal description of the property where the site is located;

a statement of the determination made by the primary law enforcement agency that the site was an illegal drug manufacturing site and the findings that formed the basis for the determination; and

the name and mailing address of the person who owns the property where the site is located.

The notice required under (a) of this section for the occupants and users of the property shall be accomplished by immediate posting of the property with a notice that includes the location of the property, the information described in (b)(2) and (3) of this section, and a statement that the property may pose a substantial risk of physical harm to persons who occupy or use the property. For purposes of posting of the notice to the occupants and users of the property required by this subsection, the posting shall be made, for property that is

a single family dwelling, at the main entryway of the property; and

other than a single family dwelling and for a hotel, motel, public inn, or similar place of public accommodation that provides lodging, at the door of the unit that is the site that constitutes the illegal drug manufacturing site.

If a person other than the owner, such as a property manager or rental agency, is authorized to let others use or occupy property for which an owner has received a notice under (a) of this section or is authorized to transfer, sell, lease, or rent the property to others, the owner of the property shall communicate the substance of the notice to that person within four days after receiving the notice.

The department shall maintain on its Internet website a list of all properties for which a notice has been issued under (a) of this section. For each of those properties, the list must contain the parcel identification number, legal description, and physical address and owner’s name at the time the notice was issued.

History.

(§ 2 ch 142 SLA 2003; am § 19 ch 53 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For illegal drug manufacturing sites, see 18 AAC 79.

Sec. 46.03.510.
Restrictions on property.

Until determined to be fit for use under AS

46.03.550

, the property for which a notice has been issued under AS

46.03.500(a)

may not be transferred, sold, leased, or rented to another person except as provided in (b) of this section, and a person may not use or occupy the property at any time after the fourth day following the day on which the property was posted with the notice required under AS

46.03.500(d)

, except as necessary for sampling, testing, or decontamination under AS

46.03.520

and

46.03.540

. An oral or written contract that would transfer, sell, lease, rent, or otherwise allow the use of the property in violation of this subsection is voidable between the parties at the option of the purchaser, transferee, user, lessee, or renter. However, this subsection does not

make voidable a promissory note or other evidence of indebtedness or a mortgage, trust deed, or other security interest securing the promissory note or evidence of indebtedness, if the note or evidence of indebtedness, mortgage, trust deed, or other security interest was given to a person other than the person transferring, selling, using, leasing, or renting the property to induce the person to finance the transfer, sale, use, leasing, or rental of the property;

make voidable a lease or rental agreement between the property owner and the person who caused the property to be contaminated and determined unfit for use; or

impair obligations or duties required to be performed on termination of a contract, as required by the contract, such as payment of damages or return of refundable deposits.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, property covered by (a) of this section may be transferred or sold if full written disclosure is made to the prospective transferee or purchaser that the property has been determined to be an illegal drug manufacturing site and the property has not been determined to be fit for use. The disclosure shall be attached to the earnest money receipt, if any, and shall accompany the transfer or sale document. The disclosure is not considered to be part of the transfer or sale document, however, and may not be recorded. The property shall continue to be subject to the restrictions in (a) of this section after transfer or sale under this subsection.

A person who knowingly transfers, sells, leases, or rents property to another, knowingly allows another to use or occupy property, or, being the owner of property, knowingly occupies or uses the property in violation of this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor. In this subsection, “knowingly” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900(a)

.

It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under (c) of this section for allowing another to use or occupy the property that the defendant or an agent of the defendant, within four days after receiving a notice under AS

46.03.500

, filed an appropriate civil action to remove the user or occupier from the property for which the notice was received.

History.

(§ 2 ch 142 SLA 2003)

Cross references. —

For penalties for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Administrative Code. —

For illegal drug manufacturing sites, see 18 AAC 79.

Sec. 46.03.520.
Sampling and testing procedures.

If the owner of the property for which notice was received under AS

46.03.500(b)

desires to determine if the property is fit for use, the owner shall cause the site to be sampled and tested for the substances covered in regulations adopted under AS

46.03.530

, using the procedures and laboratory services specified under (b) and (c) of this section. The property owner shall inform the laboratory used for sampling or testing under this subsection that the sampling and testing are related to property that has been determined to be an illegal drug manufacturing site.

The department shall establish procedures for sampling and testing property that may have been an illegal drug manufacturing site.

The department shall establish and maintain a list of laboratories in the state that have notified the department that they have the capacity to perform the sampling and testing procedures and that they wish to be on the list maintained under this subsection. A laboratory may not be included on the list unless the laboratory agrees to send the department a copy of test results related to properties whose owners have informed the laboratory that the test results are for property that has been determined to be an illegal drug manufacturing site.

History.

(§ 2 ch 142 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For illegal drug manufacturing sites, see 18 AAC 79.

Sec. 46.03.530.
Standards for determining fitness.

Property for which a notice was received under AS

46.03.500(b)

is not fit for use if sampling and testing of the property under AS

46.03.520

shows the presence of substances for which the department has set a limit under (b) of this section.

The Department of Public Safety shall annually submit a list of substances to the Department of Environmental Conservation. The department shall adopt regulations that set the limit for each substance specified by the Department of Public Safety for purposes of determining whether the property for which a notice was received under AS

46.03.500

is fit for use. The department may also determine whether there are other substances associated with illegal drug manufacturing sites that may pose a substantial risk of harm to persons who occupy or use the site or to public health and may adopt regulations that set limits for those substances for the purposes of determining whether the property for which notice was received under AS

46.03.500

is fit for use.

History.

(§ 2 ch 142 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For illegal drug manufacturing sites, see 18 AAC 79.

Sec. 46.03.540.
Decontamination requirements.

If the owner desires to decontaminate the property for which a notice has been issued under AS

46.03.500

, the owner shall follow the guidelines established by the department under (b) of this section.

The department shall establish guidelines for decontamination of sites that are determined to be unfit for use under AS

46.03.530

. The department shall provide a copy of the guidelines to any person who requests a copy.

History.

(§ 2 ch 142 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For illegal drug manufacturing sites, see 18 AAC 79.

Sec. 46.03.550.
Fitness for use.

Property for which a notice has been issued under AS

46.03.500

shall be determined by the department to be fit for use if the owner certifies to the department under penalty of unsworn falsification in the second degree that

based on sampling and testing procedures established by the department under AS

46.03.520(b)

and performed by laboratories that are on the list maintained by the department under AS

46.03.520(c)

, the limits on substances specified in regulations adopted under AS

46.03.530

are not exceeded on the property;

if the property was ever sampled and tested under AS

46.03.520

and the test results showed the property to be unfit for use under AS

46.03.530

, decontamination procedures were performed in accordance with the guidelines established under AS

46.03.540(b)

and the requirements of (1) of this subsection have been met; or

a court has held that the determination that the property was an illegal drug manufacturing site was not made in compliance with AS

46.03.500(a)

.

The department shall maintain a list of properties for which the department has received notice under AS

46.03.500(c)

. When the department determines under (a) of this section that a property on the list is fit for use, the department shall note on the list maintained on its Internet website under AS

46.03.500(f)

, and on any other list or database it maintains related to illegal drug manufacturing sites, that the property is fit for use and shall notify the owner of the property that the property is fit for use. The property shall remain on the lists or databases for five years after it is determined that the property is fit for use and shall be removed from the lists or databases within three months after the five-year period has elapsed. On request, the department shall give a copy of the list maintained under this section to any person who requests the list.

History.

(§ 2 ch 142 SLA 2003; am § 32 ch 42 SLA 2006; am § 20 ch 53 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For illegal drug manufacturing sites, see 18 AAC 79.

Sec. 46.03.560.
Securing the property.

The owner of property for which a notice was received under AS

46.03.500(b)

shall ensure that the property is vacated and secured against use

within four days after receiving the notice if the owner does not test the property under AS

46.03.520

within four days after receiving the notice; or

within four days after receiving the test results if the owner tests the property within four days after receiving the notice, the test shows the presence of a substance that exceeds the limits set in regulations adopted under AS

46.03.530

, and the owner does not begin decontamination procedures under AS

46.03.540

within four days after receiving the test results.

History.

(§ 2 ch 142 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For illegal drug manufacturing sites, see 18 AAC 79.

Sec. 46.03.570.
Duties of the department; regulations.

The department shall adopt regulations implementing AS

46.03.500

—

46.03.599

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 142 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For illegal drug manufacturing sites, see 18 AAC 79.

Sec. 46.03.599.
Definitions.

In AS

46.03.500

—

46.03.599

,

“illegal drug manufacturing site” means property on which there is reasonable cause to suspect contamination with chemicals associated with the manufacturing of a controlled substance and where

activity involving the unauthorized manufacture of a controlled substance listed on schedule I or II in AS 11.71 or a precursor chemical or necessary chemical for the substances has occurred; or

there are kept, stored, or located any of the devices, equipment, things, or substances used for the unauthorized manufacture of a controlled substance listed on schedule I or II in AS 11.71;

“site” means an illegal drug manufacturing site.

History.

(§ 2 ch 142 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For illegal drug manufacturing sites, see 18 AAC 79.